src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!   =============================================== 
!! # The Paamese morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!   =============================================== 

!! ## The Paamese letters, symbols and letter sets

!! ### Alphabet and symbols

Alphabet 
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å !!≈ * @CODE@ 
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç !!≈  @CODE@ 
 ā ē ī ō ū.  !!≈ * @CODE@ 

! A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å  !≈ * @CODE@ 
! Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð   !≈  @CODE@ 

 %> %<    !!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %+:0     !!≈ * @CODE@ for reduplication, see B&K p. 488
 ;

!! ### Sets
Sets

 Vow = a e i o u ;  !!≈  @CODE@ 
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 

 

!! ## Rule section

Rules

!! ## Reduplication rules

"R realisation as consonant"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = vora - Vopora
R:CC <=> _ E: %+: CC: ; 
      where CC in Cns ;

"E realisation as vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = vora - vOpora
E:VV <=> _ %+: Cns: VV ;
     where VV in Vow ;

"Initial stem consonant change"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = vora - voPora
Cx:Cy <=> %+: _ ;
     where Cx in (v d)
     	   Cy in (p r)
	   matched ;

!!€ RE+vora
!!€ vo0pora

!!€ RE+dora
!!€ do0rora

!!€ RE+tora
!!€ to0tora

!! ## Suffix rules

"Delete affix initial -i-"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for e- and o- stems in the Px declension.
i:0 <=> [ :e | :o ] %> _  ;

"i is backed to u before u over a morpheme boundary"
!! **RULE:  @RULENAME@** 
i:u <=> [:Vow|:Cns|.#.] _ %> u ;

"Front a stems to e before i suffixes"
a:e <=> _ %> i: ;


!! * example: ni+uasi+e = nuuasie (1SG.dist.hit.3SG; I will hit him)
!! * example: i+umo = ūmo (3PL.dist.work; they will work)
!!€ ni>uasi>e
!!€ nu>0asi>e
!!€ i>umo
!!€ u>umo

"e is backed to o where there is a following u"
!! **RULE:  @RULENAME@** = This rule applies only when the front vowel precedes the back vowel, and not when it follows the back vowel. This rule is stated without reference to any morpheme boundaries.
e:o <=> _ %>  u ; !! We should consider %< instead of %> (for prefixes)

!! * example: he+uasi+e --> houasie 3SG.dist.hit.3SG; he will hit him)
!! * example: he+usili+e --> housilie (3SG.dist.follow.3SG; he will follow him)
!!€ he>uasi>e
!!€ ho>uasi>e

"Vowel deletion in stem medial position"
!! **RULE:  @RULENAME@** = works in stem medial position, a vowel is deleted between an identical vowel and any other vowel, either preceding or following it
Vx:0 <=> :Vx %> _ Vow ;
	where Vx in ( a e i o u ) ;

!!€ ni>uasi>e
!!€ nu>0asi>e
!! * example: ni+uasi+e --> nūasie --> nuasi (1SG.dist.hit.3SG; I will hit him)

"e raising"
!! **RULE:  @RULENAME@** = e raises to i between the vowels o and a on the one hand, and the vowels a and a on the other.
e:i <=> [o|a] [%>|#] _ a ;

!!€ lenga>ealo
!!€ lenga>ialo
!!€ lango>ealo
!!€ lango>ialo


"e deletion"
!! **RULE:  @RULENAME@** = e is deleted whenever it occurs in the sequence iea
e:0 <=> i %> _ [Vow|Cns] ;

!!€ vati>ealo
!!€ vati>0alo


! "Word final vowel deletion"
! !! **RULE:  @RULENAME@**  all word final vowels in utterance final position are desyllabified following consonants, and also following vowels with the opposite marking for height. 
! 
! "word final vowels in utterance medial position"
! !! **RULE:  @RULENAME@**  word final vowels in utterance medial position are deleted in the same sets of environments.
! 
! !! * example: ahisi --> ahis
! 
! 
